Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 6. Explosives and Flammables

Cross references. —

As to storage of explosives, see §§

35-10-301

to

35-10-303

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35 C.J.S. Explosives § 3.

§ 30-2-601.
Sale of explosives; date of manufacture to be marked; sale within 12 months of manufacture.

All nitroglycerine, powder or other high explosive sold in this state shall be properly marked with the date of manufacture on each stick of powder. No nitroglycerine, powder or other high explosives shall be sold after twelve (12) months from date of manufacture.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 70, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 2964; C.S. 1920, § 3653; R.S. 1931, § 40-104; C.S. 1945, § 57-1001; W.S. 1957, § 30-239; W.S. 1977, §

30-6-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
201.06 (Matthew Bender).

§ 30-2-602.
Storage of flammable materials; smoking restricted; fire doors.

Surface storage of oils, grease and other flammable materials shall be in a storage area located at a safe distance from the powder magazine. Flammable materials shall be removed from the storage area for use only in quantities necessary to meet the requirements of a day. Structures in the storage area shall be of fire-resistive material and well ventilated. Tight metal receptacles shall be provided for oily waste.

Smoking in or about surface structures shall be restricted to places where it will not cause fire or an explosion.

Unless existing structures located within one hundred (100) feet of any mine opening are of reasonably fireproof construction, fire doors shall be erected at effective points in mine openings to prevent smoke or fire from outside sources endangering men working underground. These doors shall be tested at least monthly and kept in effective operation.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 70, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 2969; C.S. 1920, § 3655; R.S. 1931, § 40-106; C.S. 1945, § 57-1003; Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 16; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-240, 30-245; W.S. 1977, §§

30-6-102

, 30-6-107; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-2-603.
Flammable liquids; flame safety and electric lamps.

Naphtha or other flammable liquids in lamp houses shall be kept in approved containers or other safe dispensers approved by the inspector.

Flame safety lamps shall be permissible and maintained in permissible condition. All flame safety lamps shall be checked by the persons using them and by a qualified lamp attendant, or by a mine examiner, immediately before entering the mine.

When not in service, flame safety lamps and electric lamps shall be under the charge of a responsible company employee.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 30-148; W.S. 1977, § 30-3-419; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-2-604.
Requirements as to surface magazines; storage of explosives; explosion-proof illumination; use of nonmetallic tools.

Separate surface magazines shall be provided for the storage of explosives and detonators.

Surface magazines for storing and distributing high explosives shall be:

Reasonably bulletproof and constructed of incombustible material or covered with fire-resistive material. The roofs of magazines so located that it is impossible to fire bullets directly through the roof from the ground, need not be bulletproof, but where it is possible to fire bullets directly through them, roofs shall be made bullet-resistant by material construction, or by a ceiling that forms a tray containing not less than a four (4) inch thickness of sand, or by other methods;

Provided with doors constructed of three-eighths (3/8) inch steel plate lined with a two (2) inch thickness of wood, or the equivalent;

Provided with floors made of wood or other nonsparking material and have no metal or gravel exposed inside the magazine;

Provided with suitable warning signs so located that a bullet passing directly through the face of a sign will not strike the magazine;

Provided with properly screened ventilators. Equipped with no openings except for entrance and ventilation;

Kept locked securely when unattended.

High explosives may also be stored in box-type distributing magazines which shall be constructed and used in accordance with rules established by the inspector.

Main storage magazines shall be not less than one thousand (1,000) feet from any mine opening unless effectively barricaded.

The supply kept in distributing magazines shall be limited to approximately one (1) day’s requirements. Supplies of explosives and detonators may be distributed from the same magazine, if separated by at least a four (4) inch substantially fastened hardwood partition or the equivalent.

The area surrounding magazines for not less than twenty-five (25) feet in all directions shall be kept free of rubbish, dry grass, or other materials of a combustible nature.

If the explosives magazine is illuminated electrically, the lamps shall be of explosion-proof type, installed and wired so as to prevent minimum fire and contact hazards.

Only nonmetallic tools shall be used for opening containers. Extraneous materials shall not be stored in an explosives or detonator magazine.

Smoking, carrying smoker’s articles, or open flame shall be prohibited in or near any magazine.

Blasting agents shall be used and stored in accordance with rules established by the inspector.

Contents stored in magazines pursuant to this section shall be inventoried once a month or after each use.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 30-243; W.S. 1977, § 30-6-105; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1998, ch. 37, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 30-2-605.
Requirements as to underground magazines; use of nonmetallic tools.

Underground magazines shall be of substantial construction and placed in a crosscut or idle room neck at least twenty-five (25) feet from roadways or trolley wires and in a reasonably dry and well-rock-dusted place. The explosives and detonators shall be kept in separate boxes or magazines, but may be kept in the same box if separated by at least a four (4) inch substantially fastened hardwood partition or the equivalent. Not more than a forty-eight (48) hour supply of explosives, including any surplus remaining from the previous day, shall be stored underground in boxes or magazines. The inspector may approve variances in writing to the forty-eight (48) hour supply limit if the safety of miners is not adversely affected.

Explosives and detonators kept near the working faces shall be stored in separate, closed containers of substantial, nonconductive material located not less than fifteen (15) feet from rail or power lines, except if kept in a niche in the rib, the distance shall be at least five (5) feet, and in a location out of line of blast where they will not likely be subjected to shock.

Explosives and detonators shall be kept in their containers until removed for use at the working faces.

Only nonmetallic tools shall be used for opening explosives containers underground.

Underground explosives magazines and storage boxes shall be kept securely locked when unattended.

Underground explosives magazines and storage boxes shall be provided with signs indicating their contents.

Contents stored in magazines and storage boxes pursuant to this section shall be inventoried at least once a month and after each use.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 30-244; W.S. 1977, § 30-6-106; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2001, ch. 80, § 1.

§ 30-2-606.
Requirements as to explosives carried underground.

Permissible explosives or detonators carried underground shall be in individual containers constructed of substantial nonconductive material, maintained in good condition and kept closed.

When explosives or detonators are transported underground by locomotive, rope, or shuttle car, they shall be in special covered cars or in special containers.

The bodies and covers of special cars and the containers shall be constructed of nonconductive material.

If the explosives and detonators are hauled in the same explosives car or in the same special container, they shall be separated by at least a four (4) inch substantially fastened hardwood partition or the equivalent.

Explosives and detonators shall not be carried on the same man-trip with workmen.

Where quantities of explosives and detonators are transported in special cars or in special containers in cars, they shall be hauled on a special trip, and shall not be hauled into or out of a mine within five (5) minutes preceding or following a man-trip or any other trip.

Explosives or detonators shall not be transported on flight or shaking conveyors, scrapers, mechanical loading machines, locomotives, cutting machines or drill trucks.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 30-246; W.S. 1977, § 30-6-108; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2.

§ 30-2-607.
Only permissible explosives or blasting devices to be used; requirements as to use.

Only permissible explosives or permissible blasting devices shall be used in all underground coal mines for the blasting of coal or other blasting operations, except as otherwise provided by law.

The use of permissible explosives shall comply with the following:

Fired only with electric detonators of proper strength;

Fired with permissible blasting units unless blasting is done from the surface;

Boreholes in coal shall not be drilled beyond the back of the cut, nor into the solid rib, roof or floor;

Boreholes shall be cleaned and checked to see that they are placed properly and are of correct depth, in relation to the cut, before being charged;

To prevent blow-throughs, all portions of the boreholes where the height of the coal permits, shall have a burden in all directions of at least eighteen (18) inches before being fired;

Boreholes shall be stemmed to the collar with incombustible material;

In gassy mines examinations for gas shall be made immediately before and as soon as practicable after blasting.

Charges exceeding one and one-half (1 1/2) pounds, but not exceeding three (3) pounds, shall be used only if boreholes are six (6) feet or more in depth, and explosives are charged in a continuous train, with no cartridges deliberately deformed or crushed, with all cartridges in contact with each other, and with the end cartridges touching the back of the hole and the stemming respectively, and Class A or Class B permissible explosives are used, provided that the three (3) pound limit shall not apply to solid rock work such as solid rock tunnels, shafts, etc.

Boreholes shall not be charged while any other work is being done at the face. A shot shall be fired before any other work is done, except work necessary to safeguard the employees.

Only wooden tamping bars shall be used when charging holes.

Leg wires of electric detonators shall be kept shunted or the ends twisted together until ready to connect to the firing cable.

Shots shall not be fired from the power or signal circuit.

Roof and faces of working places shall be tested immediately before and after blasting.

Ample warning shall be given before shots are fired, and care shall be taken to ascertain that all persons are in the clear. Men shall be removed from adjoining working places when there is danger of a shot blowing through.

Mixed charges shall not be charged or fired in any borehole.

Adobe (mudcap) or other open, unconfined shots shall not be fired in any mine.

Blasting cables shall be well insulated, staggered as to length or kept well separated when attached to the detonator leg wires, and kept clear of power wires and other possible sources of stray currents.

Power wires in face regions shall be deenergized during charging and blasting operations.

Where misfires occur with electric detonators, a waiting period of at least five (5) minutes shall elapse before anyone returns to the shot. After such failure, the blasting cable shall be disconnected from the source of power and the battery end short-circuited before electric connections are examined.

Explosives shall be removed by firing a separate charge at least two (2) feet away from, and parallel to, the misfired charge or by washing the stemming and the charge from the borehole with water, or by inserting and firing a new primer after the stemming has been washed out.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 30-247; W.S. 1977, § 30-6-109; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

in (p), inserted “a” preceding “waiting period.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.